Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2544.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1164 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1164. Compensation [Plans] Agreements for School Administrators.--(a) As used in this section, the following words will have the following meanings:"Administrative compensation" shall mean administrator salaries and fringe benefits and shall include any board decision that directly affects administrator compensation such as administrative evaluation and early retirement programs."Agreement" shall mean the compensation and benefits plan for 12345678910111213141516171819 school administrators."Public Employe Relations Act" shall mean the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the "Public Employe Relations Act.""School administrator" shall mean any employe of the school entity below the rank of district superintendent, executive director, director of career and technical school, assistant district superintendent or assistant executive director, but including [the rank of first level supervisor] an individual with a supervisory or administrative certificate from the Department of Education, who by virtue of assigned duties is not in a bargaining unit of public employes as created under the [act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the "Public Employe Relations Act."] Public Employe Relations Act. However, this definition shall not apply to anyone who has the duties and responsibilities of the position of business manager or personnel director[, but not to include principals]. This definition shall include principals, assistant principals or vice principals."School employer" shall mean a board of school directors, the area career and technical school board of directors or the intermediate unit board of school directors as defined in this act.(b) The purpose of this section is to provide a means by which compensation and other matters affecting school administrators can be resolved within the framework of a management team philosophy.(c) School employers[, upon the written request of a majority of the school administrators in the district,] shall be required to meet and discuss in good faith with the school 20260HB2544PN3451 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administrators on [administrator] compensation, performance evaluations and benefits prior to adoption of the [compensation plan] agreement.(d) School employers shall be required to adopt written [administrator compensation plans] agreements which shall apply to all eligible school administrators, as provided in this section, and which shall continue in effect until a time specified in the [compensation plan] agreement, but in no event for less than one school year nor more than five school years.(e) An [administrator compensation plan] agreement adopted pursuant to this section shall include, but not be limited to, the following items:(1) A description of the program determining administrative salaries.(2) Salary amounts or a salary schedule.(3) A listing of fringe benefits.(4) A process for performance evaluation, which shall comply with section 1138.4.(5) A complaint process under the school employer's board policy.(6) If, after the school employer's complaint process is conducted and a dispute still exists, or if no complaint process exists in the school employer's board policy, a nonbinding process for the mediation of disputes arising out of the interpretation of provisions of an agreement, with mediation services to be provided by the Pennsylvania Bureau of Mediation. The following shall apply:(i) If the school administrator elects the mediation process provided under this clause to resolve a dispute, the election shall constitute a waiver of any right the school administrator 20260HB2544PN3451 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may have to file an appeal under section 1131.(ii) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a school administrator from appealing the involved action of the board to a court in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).(e.1) Once an agreement is approved by the school employer and entered into the minutes, the agreement shall be binding.(e.2) The terms of a previous agreement shall remain in place until a new agreement is ratified by the school employer.(f) School employers and school administrators shall continue to be subject to the act of June 30, 1947 (P.L.1183, No.492), referred to as the Public Employe Anti-Strike Law.(g) If a school administrator has a concern about the school administrator's performance or other administrative rights as specified in an agreement, the school administrator shall be entitled to the following appeal process:(1) Upon written request from the school administrator, the district superintendent shall meet with the school administrator in an attempt to resolve the issue in question. The school administrator may choose to be represented at the meeting by another school administrator covered under agreement.(2) If the issue is not resolved after the meeting under clause (1), the school administrator may submit a written request for a meeting with the school employer. A majority of members of the board of school directors or a committee of the board of school directors shall meet with the school administrator, in executive session, in an effort to resolve the issue. The school administrator may choose to be represented at 20260HB2544PN3451 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the meeting by another school administrator covered under agreement.(h) If a school administrator is summoned to a meeting by the school administrator's supervisor in which discipline, termination or personal working conditions may be discussed, the school administrator shall have the right to representation at the meeting. The school administrator may choose to be represented at the meeting by another school administrator covered under an agreement.(i) If a school administrator is summoned to attend a meeting by the school administrator's supervisor in which the solicitor or another attorney is present on behalf of the school employer, the school administrator shall have the right to reschedule the meeting until the school administrator is able to obtain legal representation.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2544PN3451 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516